New Jersey, session 221, A3310.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning on the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.         ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) the board of county commissioners shall not enter into any community benefits agreement as a result of which the county will receive a cash payment of $100,000 or more, unless the agreement requires that 50 percent or more of the cash payment be dedicated to affordable housing purposes within the county. b.  As used in this section: Affordable housing purposes means the creation or rehabilitation of low income housing or moderate income housing as those terms are defined in section 4 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C52:27D-304; and Community benefits agreement means a binding legal agreement between the board of county commissioners and a developer of a commercial or residential project, and may also include other community stakeholders, under which the developer agrees to pay for or provide certain resources to accommodate and benefit local community interests.  In exchange, for these community benefits, the board of county commissioners and other community stakeholders agree to approve or provide support for the developers project. 2.  a.  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning on the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.         ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) the governing body of any municipality shall not enter into any community benefits agreement as a result of which the municipality will receive a cash payment of $100,000 or more, unless the agreement requires that 50 percent or more of the cash payment be dedicated to affordable housing purposes within the municipality. b.  As used in this section: Affordable housing purposes means the creation or rehabilitation of low income housing or moderate income housing as those terms are defined in section 4 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C52:27D-304; and Community benefits agreement means a binding legal agreement between the governing body of a municipality and a developer of a commercial or residential project, and may also include other community stakeholders, under which the developer agrees to pay for or provide certain resources to accommodate and benefit local community interests.  In exchange, for these community benefits, the governing body of the municipality and other community stakeholders agree to approve or provide support for the developers project. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.